Maryland, session 2025, HB0673.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Real Property
11–111.6.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0673*

HOUSE BILL 673
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “ELECTRIC VEHICLE RECHARGING EQUIPMENT” HAS
THE MEANING STATED IN § 11–111.4 OF THIS TITLE.
(B) A RECORDED COVENANT OR RESTRICTION, A PROVISION IN A
DECLARATION, OR A PROVISION IN THE BYLAWS OR RULES OF A CONDOMINIUM MAY
NOT PROHIBIT OR UNREASONABLY RESTRICT THE GOVERNING BODY FROM
INSTALLING OR AUTHORIZING THE INSTALLATION OF ELECTRIC VEHICLE
RECHARGING EQUIPMENT IN COMMON USE OR LIMITED COMMON USE PARKING
SPACES.
(C) THE INSTALLATION OR AUTHORIZATION OF INSTALLATION OF
ELECTRIC VEHICLE RECHARGING EQUIPMENT BY A GOVERNING BODY SHALL BE
SUBJECT TO THE ORDINARY BUDGET PROCESS OF THE CONDOMINIUM.
(D) A GOVERNING BODY SHALL CONSIDER THE AVAILABILITY OF
SUFFICIENT PARKING TO MEET THE NEEDS OF THE COMMUNITY BEFORE
INSTALLING OR AUTHORIZING THE INSTALLATION OF ELECTRIC VEHICLE
RECHARGING EQUIPMENT IN COMMON USE OR LIMITED COMMON USE PARKING
SPACES.
(E) NOTWITHSTANDING THE PROVISIONS OF § 11–125 OF THIS TITLE, THE
GOVERNING BODY MAY GRANT A LICENSE FOR UP TO 3 YEARS, RENEWABLE AT THE
DISCRETION OF THE GOVERNING BODY, ON ANY COMMON ELEMENT NECESSARY FOR
THE INSTALLATION OF EQUIPMENT OR FOR THE SUPPLY OF ELECTRICITY TO ANY
ELECTRIC VEHICLE RECHARGING EQUIPMENT.
11B–111.11.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “ELECTRIC VEHICLE RECHARGING EQUIPMENT” HAS
THE MEANING STATED IN § 11–111.4 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(B) A RECORDED COVENANT OR RESTRICTION, A PROVISION IN A
DECLARATION, OR A PROVISION IN THE BYLAWS OR RULES OF A HOMEOWNERS
ASSOCIATION MAY NOT PROHIBIT OR UNREASONABLY RESTRICT THE GOVERNING
BODY FROM INSTALLING OR AUTHORIZING THE INSTALLATION OF ELECTRIC
VEHICLE RECHARGING EQUIPMENT IN COMMON USE OR LIMITED COMMON USE
PARKING SPACES.
(C) THE INSTALLATION OR AUTHORIZATION OF INSTALLATION OF
ELECTRIC VEHICLE RECHARGING EQUIPMENT BY A GOVERNING BODY SHALL BE
SUBJECT TO THE ORDINARY BUDGET PROCESS OF THE HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION.
(D) A GOVERNING BODY SHALL CONSIDER THE AVAILABILITY OF

HOUSE BILL 673 3
SUFFICIENT PARKING TO MEET THE NEEDS OF THE COMMUNITY BEFORE
INSTALLING OR AUTHORIZING THE INSTALLATION OF ELECTRIC VEHICLE
RECHARGING EQUIPMENT IN COMMON USE OR LIMITED COMMON USE PARKING
SPACES.
(E) THE GOVERNING BODY MAY GRANT A LICENSE FOR UP TO 3 YEARS,
RENEWABLE AT THE DISCRETION OF THE GOVERNING BODY, ON ANY COMMON
ELEMENT NECESSARY FOR THE INSTALLATION OF EQUIPMENT OR FOR THE SUPPLY
OF ELECTRICITY TO ANY ELECTRIC VEHICLE RECHARGING EQUIPMENT.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall be construed to
apply retroactively and shall be applied to and interpreted to affect any covenant or
restriction, or provision in a declaration, bylaws, or rules, recorded or adopted before the
effective date of this Act.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.